Delaware, session 153, HB390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 6923, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6923. Competitive sealed bidding. (p) Â Electronic bid submission. â Â  (1) If the Office or an agency determines that Â an Â  Â requiring Â electronic bid submissionÂ in response to an advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal, or allowing electronic bid submission as an option for submission of a response to an advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal Â is advantageous, the Office or the agency may use electronic biddingÂ through a platform or provider of their choosing Â  to obtain bids for the purchase of goods and nonprofessional services. The Office or an agency must accept paper submissions when the cost of materials and non-professional services covered by the advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal is less than $500,000 but more than the amount specified by the Office of Management and Budget in the applicable annual Small Purchase Procedures and Thresholds guidance. (2) The solicitation must designate that the procurement method will be an Â solely by electronic bid Â submission, bids, or if electronic and paper bid submissions will both be accepted, a schedule of bid activities, and Â an electronic mail account Â  the approved platform or vendor to which the bidding response must be sent. (3) Â The Â  Â When the Office or an agency limits bidding to electronic bid submissions, the Â  Sectionâs or the agencyâs representative and a witness shall open the Â e-mail account Â  Â bids received via the approved platform or provider Â immediately after the closing date andÂ time; record the vendors that submitted bids, the date and time submitted, the bids, and associatedÂ prices; and prepare a bid tabulation of all responsive vendors for review.Â The Office or the agencyâs representative opening the bid does not need to provide space for or conduct a public meeting or open the bid in the presence of the public. (4) When the Office or an agency chooses to accept both electronic and paper bid submissions in response to an advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal, the Office or agency must follow the requirements for doing a public bid opening, including providing facilities for public attendance at the bid opening. Section 2. Amend Â§ 6924, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6924. Competitive sealed proposal; request for proposal procedure. (b) Â Advertising requirements. â Â  (1) Proposals shall be solicited through a request for proposal which shall be issued and shall Â include Â indicate whether a bid must be submitted electronically or if both electronic and paper submissions will be accepted. The proposal must identify the platform or provider for submitting and receiving electronic bids as provided for in Â§â6923(p)(1) of this title, and Â  the location where Â paper Â proposals are to be received and the date and time the proposals are to be opened. (2) Adequate public notice of the request for proposals shall be given in the Â same Â  manner as provided in Â§â6923(b) of this title. (3) Proposals Â shall Â that are submitted in response to an advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal which specifies that paper bids and electronic bids will be accepted must Â be opened publicly at the time and place designated in the request for proposals. The name of each offeror and such other relevant information as is specified in the request for proposals shall be read Â publicly Â  Â and displayed on the electronic bidding platform or provider Â andÂ recorded in accordance with the request for proposal promulgated by the agency. All other information contained in the proposals shall be confidential so as to avoid disclosure of contents prejudicial to competing offerors during the process of negotiation. (4) The opening of the electronic submissions submitted for advertisements, solicitations, or requests for proposal, where electronic submission is the sole manner of bidding, does not need to be completed in a setting open to the public. The name of each offeror and such other relevant information as is specified in the request for proposals must be read, displayed electronically online through the designated platform or provider, and recorded in accordance with the request for proposal promulgated by the agency. All other information contained in the proposals must be confidential to avoid disclosure of contents prejudicial to competing offerors during the process of negotiation. (4) Â (5) Â The request for proposals shall state the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors. (5) Â (6) Offerors intending to submit proposals may be afforded an opportunity for discussion for the purpose of clarification to assure full understanding of and responsiveness to the solicitation requirements. Negotiations may be conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals found to be reasonably likely to be selected for award. Offerors Â shall Â  Â must Â  be accorded fair treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and amending proposals, and such amendments may be permitted after submissions and before award for the purpose of obtaining best and final offers. In conducting discussions, there Â shall Â  Â must Â be no disclosure of any information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors. (6) Â (7) The award shall be made in writing to the responsible offeror or offerors whose proposal is determined to be the most advantageous to the State taking into consideration the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No other factors or criteria may be used in the evaluation. (The award of a contract for goods Â and/or Â  Â or Â services may be made upon criteria which do not include price. The contract file shall contain the basis on which the award is made.) Section 3. Amend Â§ 6962, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6962. Large public works contract procedures [For application of this section, see 82 Del. Laws, c. 36, Â§ 3]. (b) Â Advertising requirements. â Â Each agency shall publicly announce, for 2 consecutive weeks, each public works contract unless a shorter advertisement period has been approved by the Section Director. Public advertising shall require electronic publication accessible to the public in a manner prescribed pursuant to Â§ 6902(12) of this title for 2 consecutive weeks unless a shorter advertisement period has been approved by the Section Director. Â Director and the electronic procurement advertising system described in Â§â6902(12) of this title, for each public works contract. Â An agency may also maintain a register of prospective bidders which may be used to provide direct notification of contracts to be bid. This register shall not be used in a manner which will limit the competitiveness of the bidding process described in this subchapter. No agency shall be subject to a cause of action or be otherwise liable for any errors or omissions in administering a bid registry. The public announcement shall also state the nature of the contract under the following conditions: (3) Â If an agency requires bids be submitted electronically, the agency must state the requirement in the advertisement and identify the platform or provider for submission of the electronic bid. The Office or an agency must accept paper submissions when the cost of the large public works contract covered by the advertisement, solicitation, or request for proposal is less than $500,000 but more than the amount specified by the Office of Management and Budget in the applicable annual Small Purchase Procedures and Thresholds guidance. (d) Â Bid specifications and plans requirements Â . â (12) Â Public bid opening requirements. â Â  a. Â Unless bids are accepted only by electronic submission, Â  Â Bids Â bids Â Â shall be opened publicly and the contractor and total bid price or the contractor, base bid, and alternate price should be read aloudÂ and displayed Â at the time and place designated in the plans and specifications. Â If bids are accepted only by electronic submission, opening shall be in accordance with paragraph (d)(13)g. of this section. b. Bids shall be unconditionally accepted without alteration. After the bid opening, no corrections in bid prices or other provisions of bids prejudicial to the interests of the State or fair competition shall be permitted. (13) Â Bid evaluation, contract award and execution procedure Â . â a. The contracting agency shall award any public works contract within 30 days of the bid opening to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder, unless the agency elects to award on the basis of best value, in which case the election to award on the basis of best value shall be stated in the invitation to bid. Â By mutual consent, the agency and the awarded bidder may extend the time limit for contract award. Any public school district and its board shall award public works contracts in accordance with this sectionâs requirements except it shall award the contract within 60 days of the bid opening. A contracting agency shall extend the 30-day bid evaluation period by a total of 5 working days and a school district shall extend the 60-day bid evaluation period by a total of 5 working days if a bid is nonresponsive or a bidder is judged to be not responsible, and the bidder cannot be notified in writing a minimum of 5 days prior to the end of the 30-day bid evaluation period in the case of an agency, or the 60-day bid evaluation period in the case of a school district. Written notification to the bidder or bidders whose bid is non-responsive or who have been determined to be not responsible shall be received at least 5 working days prior to the end of the original or the extended evaluation period and shall specify the reason or reasons why the bid is nonresponsive or the bidder determined to be not responsible. If the bid evaluation period is extended by 5 working days, the contracting agency or school district shall notify each bidder in writing prior to the end of the 30-day bid evaluation period in the case of an agency, or the 60-day bid evaluation period in the case of a school district, that the bid evaluation period is being extended by 5 working days. The written notification to all bidders shall include the calendar date by which the agency or school district shall award a contract or reject all bids. g. Â Electronic bid or electronic submission Â . â 1. Â If the Office or an agency determines that an electronic bid or electronic submission is beneficial, the Office or the agency may use the selected method to obtain bids for public works contracts. Â If the Office or agency limits bidding submissions to electronic submission, the Officeâs or the agencyâs representative and a witness must open the bids received via the approved platform or provider immediately after the closing date and time, without the need to provide space for or conduct a public meeting or bid opening in the presence of the public, record the vendors that submitted bids, the date and time submitted, the bids, and associated prices. The Office or agency must prepare a bid tabulation of all responsive vendors for review, which must be made available and posted on the agencyâs website within 2 business days of the bid being awarded. This manner of opening electronic only bid submissions is exempted from the requirements of Chapter 100 of this title regarding public meetings. 2. The opening of the electronic submissions submitted for lettings where electronic submissions were selected as the sole manner of bidding need not be completed in a setting open to the public. All other information contained in the proposals must be confidential to avoid disclosure of contents prejudicial to competing offerors during the process of negotiation. 3. When the Office or agency chooses to accept both electronic and paper bid submissions in response to a letting, the Office or agency must follow the requirements for doing a public bid opening set forth in paragraph (d)(13)g.4. of this section, including providing facilities for public attendance at the bid opening. 4. Proposals which are submitted in response to a letting that specifies that paper bids and electronic bids will be accepted must be opened at the time and place designated in the request for proposals. The name of each offeror and other relevant information as is specified in the request for proposals must be read and displayed publicly and recorded in accordance with the request for proposal promulgated by the agency. All other information contained in the proposals must be confidential to avoid disclosure of contents prejudicial to competing offerors during the process of negotiation. 2. Â  Â 5. Â  The solicitation must designate that the procurement method will beÂ solely Â an electronic bid or electronic submission, Â or if electronic and paper submissions will be accepted, the solicitation must designate Â a schedule of bid activities, and an electronic mail account to which the response must be sent. 3. The Officeâs or the agencyâs representative and a witness shall open the electronic mail account immediately after the closing date and time; record the names of the vendors that responded, the date and time submitted, and the bids or associated prices; and prepare a tabulation of all responsive vendors for review. Section 4. Amend Â§ 6908, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: (a) In addition to the powers and duties prescribed by other sections in this chapter, the Section shall do all of the following: (7) a. Administer on behalf of all agencies the Stateâs centralized procurement computer system or software that is used for contract development, solicitation, evaluation, and contract administration, including public posting of notice of awarded agency contracts. The Section may, with written approval of the Director, authorize an agency to operate, with approved integration, a separate bidding or contract administration platform provided that all information is readily shared with the statewide portal managed by the Section. The announcement of bid solicitations, other solicitations, and associated notices for the required duration on a site designated by the Section satisfies the public notice and advertisement requirements of this chapter. b. The centralized computer system administered by the Section shall serve as the Stateâs system of record. Any agency that has elected to use a secondary electronic bid system or solution shall ensure that all requisite information is also provided for publication on the state system of record. SYNOPSIS This House Substitute for House Bill No. 390 clarifies that the agencies may, in their discretion, determine the methodology to be used for bid submission, including limiting bidding to solely electronic submissions. This Act allows for electronic bidding to be conducted through a platform of the agencyâs choice. Where electronic bidding is identified as the sole manner of bidding, the agency is not required to provide an anchor location for public attendance at the bid opening. The agency is then required to provide the results of the bidding in real time via an electronic remote hosting platform of the agencyâs choosing. The agency must post the results of the solicitation to their website within 2 business days. Additionally, this Act clarifies that a newspaper advertisement is not required if advertisement is submitted to the electronic procurement advertising system defined in Â§ 6902(12) of this title. Finally, this Act clarifies that the agency and awarded bidder may mutually consent to extend the time limit for a contract award. This House Substitute differs from the original bill by adding that the agency must accept paper submissions when the solicitation or request for proposal is under $500,000 but more than the amount specified by the Office of Management and Budget in their annual guidance. It includes that the centralized computer system administered by the Section of Government Support Services will serve as the State's system of record. This substitute also makes technical corrections to conform with the Delaware Legislative Drafting Manual.